Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.28
Motorcycle, defined.

Motorcycle means every motor vehicle, except a tractor, having a seat or saddle for use of the rider and designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground and for which evidence of title is required as a condition precedent to registration under the laws of this state. Motorcycle includes an autocycle.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 40;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 42;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 116.